Washington statutes.
RCW 8.08.020

Public use declared.

Any condemnation, appropriation or disposition intended in RCW 8.08.010 through 8.08.080 shall be deemed and held to be for a county purpose and public use within the meaning of RCW 8.08.010 through 8.08.080 when it is directly or indirectly, approximately or remotely for the general benefit or welfare of the county or of the inhabitants thereof.

[ 1949 c 79 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-7.]